Georgia, session 2025_26, SB29.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 6A of Chapter 3 of Title 35 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
DNA sampling, collection, and analysis, is amended by revising Code Section 35-3-160,
relating to DNA analysis in felony convictions and certain felony charges and performance
of tests, as follows:
"35-3-160.
(a) As used in this article, the term:
(1) 'Department' means the Department of Corrections.
S. B. 29
- 1 -

SB 29/FA
(2) 'Detention facility' means a penal institution under the jurisdiction of the department,
including penal institutions operated by a private company on behalf of the department,
inmate work camps, inmate boot camps, probation detention centers, parole revocation
centers, and county correctional facilities any place of confinement for juvenile or adult
individuals accused of, convicted of, or adjudicated for violating a law of this state or an
ordinance of a political subdivision of this state.
(3)(2) 'Division' means the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of
Investigation bureau.
(b)(1) A Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a sample of
deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) shall be collected by oral swab or other noninvasive
procedure from any individual who has been arrested for the commission of a serious
violent felony, as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1; in this state:
(A) Who has been convicted of a felony and is currently incarcerated in a detention
facility, serving a probation sentence, or serving under the jurisdiction of the State
Board of Pardons and Paroles for such felony;
(B) Who has been charged with a felony, and sentence for such offense has been
imposed pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 or pursuant to subsection (a) or
(c) of Code Section 16-13-2; or
(C) Who has been convicted of a felony and is subject to an immigration detainer
notice as such term is defined in Code Section 42-1-11.5.
(2) Unless a DNA sample has already been collected by the department or another
agency or entity, each DNA sample required by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
collected by the detention facility which is detaining or the entity which is supervising
such individual, and the sample shall be forwarded to the division.
(2) A detention facility shall not be required to collect a DNA sample from any
individual for whom a sample has already been received by the division and that has not
been destroyed pursuant to Code Section 35-3-165.
S. B. 29
- 2 -

SB 29/FA
(3) Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply to any individual who has been
arrested for the commission of a misdemeanor for a conviction for a misdemeanor, to any
individual who is charged with a misdemeanor and the sentence for such misdemeanor
is imposed pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 regarding first offenders, or
because he or she has been charged with a misdemeanor.
(c) DNA analysis shall be performed by the division. The division shall be authorized to
contract with individuals or organizations for services to perform such analysis. The
identifying characteristics of the profile resulting from the DNA analysis shall be stored
and maintained by the bureau in a DNA data bank in accordance with Code
Sections 35-3-162 and 35-3-163 and shall be made available only as provided in Code
Section 35-3-163."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 35-3-161, relating to time and
procedure for withdraw of blood samples, as follows:
"35-3-161.
(a) Each sample required pursuant to Code Section 35-3-160 from persons individuals
who are to be incarcerated arrested for the commission of a serious violent felony, as such
term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1; shall be collected at the time such individuals
are booked or otherwise processed by the detention facility withdrawn within the first 30
days of incarceration at the receiving unit of the detention facility or at such other place as
is designated by the department. Each sample required pursuant to Code Section 35-3-160
from persons who are to be released from a detention facility shall be withdrawn within the
12 months preceding such person's release at a place designated by the department. The
required samples from persons who are not sentenced to a term of confinement shall be
withdrawn as a condition of probation. The division shall publish in its quality manuals
the procedures for the collection and transfer of samples to such division pursuant to Code
S. B. 29
- 3 -

SB 29/FA
Section 35-3-154. Personnel at a detention facility shall implement the provisions of this
Code section as part of the regular processing of offenders.
(b) Samples collected by oral swab or by a noninvasive procedure may be collected by any
individual who has been trained in the procedure. Only a correctional health nurse
technician, physician, registered professional nurse, licensed practical nurse, graduate
laboratory technician, or phlebotomist shall withdraw any sample of blood to be submitted
for analysis. No civil liability shall attach to any person authorized to take a sample as
provided in this article as a result of the act of taking a sample from any person submitting
thereto, provided that the sample was taken according to recognized medically accepted
procedures. However, no person shall be relieved from liability for negligence in the
withdrawing of any blood sample.
(c) Chemically clean sterile disposable needles shall be used for the withdrawal of all
samples of blood. The containers for blood DNA samples, oral swabs, and the samples
obtained by noninvasive procedures collected pursuant to this article shall be sealed and
labeled with the subject's name, social security number, date of birth, race, and gender plus
the name of the person collecting the sample and the date and place of collection. The
containers shall be secured to prevent tampering with the contents. The steps set forth in
this subsection relating to the taking, handling, identification, and disposition of samples
are procedural and not substantive. Substantial compliance therewith shall be deemed to
be sufficient. The samples collected pursuant to this article shall be transported to the
division not more than 15 days following withdrawal the date of collection and shall be
analyzed and stored in the DNA data bank in accordance with Code Sections 35-3-162
and 35-3-163.
(d) Personnel at a detention facility shall implement the provisions of this Code section as
part of the regular processing of arrested individuals."
S. B. 29
- 4 -

SB 29/FA
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 35-3-165, relating to expungement
of DNA profile in data bank and requirements, as follows:
"35-3-165.
(a) The bureau shall purge all records and identifiable information in the data bank
pertaining to the DNA profile of the individual and shall destroy all such DNA samples
100 collected from such individual within 30 days of the receipt of:
101 (1) A a certified copy of the applicable:
102 (A) Court order or documentation from the prosecuting attorney stating that all charges
103 for which the DNA profile was created were dismissed; or
104 (1)(B) Court order reversing the conviction of all charges for which the DNA profile
105 was created together with a court order or documentation from the prosecuting attorney
106 stating that the charges were dismissed;
107 (2) Judgment of acquittal of all charges for which the DNA profile was created;
108 (3) Sentencing order showing that all of the felony charges for which the DNA profile
109 was created were reduced to misdemeanors; or
110 (4) Court order showing the successful completion of the a sentence relating to all of the
111 charges for which the DNA profile was created that was imposed pursuant to Article 3
112 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 or pursuant to subsection (a) or (c) of Code Section 16-13-2;
113 (5) Satisfactory proof that the applicable statute of limitations for each of the offenses
114 relating to the charges for which the DNA profile was created has expired and that no
115 such charges remain pending; or
116 (6) A combination of any of the above that provides satisfactory proof that none of the
117 charges for which the DNA profile was created remain pending and that the individual
118 has not been convicted of any such charges.
S. B. 29
- 5 -

SB 29/FA
119 (b) A DNA sample obtained in good faith shall be deemed to have been obtained in
120 accordance with the requirements of this article and its use in accordance with this article
121 shall be authorized until it is expunged as set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section."
122 SECTION 4.
123 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 29
- 6 -